Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 5

McCampbell House

4-13-501. Expenditure of funds.

The Tennessee state museum is authorized to expend any funds appropriated or available to it in the administration, operation, maintenance, repair, renovation and restoration of the mansion home, McCampbell House in Donelson, that was bequeathed to the museum and for the improvement of the premises.

The museum is authorized, in lieu of contracting itself for the repair, renovation and restoration of the mansion house, to authorize an appropriate organization to contract for the same, within the limit of the funds set aside for such purpose, and to furnish the funds to such organization, to be used for that purpose, under such safeguards as the museum may prescribe.

Acts 2010, ch. 877, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§4-13-501 —4-13-506 (Acts 1977, ch. 258, §§ 1-5), concerning the Fort Loudoun memorial, was repealed by Acts 1987, ch. 109, § 2(b).

4-13-502. Administration, operation and maintenance.

The Tennessee state museum shall hold legal title to the property, but is authorized and empowered to assign the actual custody and control of the property to a Tennessee not-for-profit corporation organized for the express purpose of restoring, maintaining and operating the McCampbell House. Any such corporation shall have the right to operate and manage the property on behalf of the Tennessee state museum for the benefit of the general public, and to keep the property and improvements in a high state of improvement and repair, and to operate and maintain the grounds improved by the Tennessee state museum in a manner consistent with such guidelines as may be developed by the Tennessee state museum, or as the Tennessee state museum shall contract with the corporation.

Acts 2010, ch. 877, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§4-13-501 —4-13-506 (Acts 1977, ch. 258, §§ 1-5), concerning the Fort Loudoun memorial, was repealed by Acts 1987, ch. 109, § 2(b).